Nebraska, session 109, LB39.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB39 LB39
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 8-124.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
8-124.01 Within thirty days of a vacancy on the board of directors
of a bank, the bank shall notify the department of the vacancy At any
time that a vacancy on the board of directors of a bank occurs, the bank
shall, within thirty days, notify the department of the vacancy.
Vacancies shall be filled within ninety days by appointment by the
remaining directors, and any director so appointed shall serve until the
next election of directors, except that if the vacancy created leaves a
minimum of five directors, appointment shall be optional. When the
vacancy has been filled, the bank shall make application to the
department for approval of the director appointed in accordance with
section 8-126.
Sec. 2. Original section 8-124.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-